Louisiana, session 2026, HB685.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2212.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2212.11. Procurement of public motor vehicles; rolling stock and related
equipment procurement; Fixing America's Surface Transportation Act
A. The Louisiana legislature finds that the procurement of public motor
vehicles and rolling stock is an unnecessarily lengthy process. Current federal law,
the Fixing American's Surface Transportation Act (FAST Act), provides for long-
term funding certainty for surface transportation infrastructure planning and
investment and reestablished a Bus Discretionary Program to allow states to apply
for project-specific funding through cooperative purchases. In utilizing the FAST
Act, it has allowed for many state and local governments to streamline critical
transportation projects. At this time, Louisiana entities are barred from utilizing the
FAST Act based on the required use of the Louisiana Uniform Bid Form within R.S.
38:2212.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 685 ENROLLED
B. In addition to the procurement methods available to all political
subdivisions, the state of Louisiana and any local municipality, parish, or other
subdivision of the state may procure public motor vehicles and rolling stock and
related equipment using the methods approved by and in compliance with Section
3019 of the Public Law 114-94 (the FAST Act).
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.